Nevada, session 83, AB94.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each contractor and subcontractor on a public work shall
register for and participate in the E-Verify system to verify the
eligibility for employment of all workers on the public work.
-
*AB94*

– 2 –
2. As used in this section, “E-Verify system” means the
electronic employment verification system established pursuant to
8 U.S.C. § 1324a and administered by the United States
Department of Homeland Security through which employers may
verify the eligibility for employment of their employees.
Sec. 2. NRS 338.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.015 1. The Labor Commissioner shall enforce the
provisions of NRS 338.010 to 338.130, inclusive [.] , and section 1
of this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 338.035 and in
addition to any other remedy or penalty provided in this chapter, if
any person, including, without limitation, a public body, violates
any provision of NRS 338.010 to 338.130, inclusive, and section 1
of this act, or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the Labor
Commissioner may, after providing the person with notice and an
opportunity for a hearing, impose against the person an
administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 for each such
violation.
3. The Labor Commissioner may, by regulation, establish a
sliding scale based on the severity of the violation to determine the
amount of the administrative penalty to be imposed against the
person pursuant to this section.
4. The Labor Commissioner shall report the violation to the
Attorney General, and the Attorney General may prosecute the
person in accordance with law.
H
-
*AB94*